Utah statutes.
78B-14-303.   Application of law of state.

Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, a responding tribunal of this state shall:

(1)  apply the procedural and substantive law generally applicable to similar proceedings originating in this state and may exercise all powers and provide all remedies available in those proceedings; and

(2)  determine the duty of support and the amount payable in accordance with the law and support guidelines of this state.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 3, 2008 General Session

